Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-205
Insurance companies; formation; articles of incorporation; filing.

Five or more natural persons may act as incorporators of an insurance corporation. The articles of incorporation shall be signed by each incorporator and delivered to the Department of Insurance for approval or disapproval, and if approved and found by it to be in accordance with the laws of this state, the department shall so certify. When such articles are thus approved, they shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State and a duplicate copy bearing the date of filing in the office of the Secretary of State shall be filed in the office of the department. Upon the filing and recording of the articles of incorporation in the office of the Secretary of State as provided in this section corporate existence shall commence.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 81, p. 429;

R.S.1913, § 3218;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. V, § 4, p. 609;

Laws 1921, c. 305, § 1, p. 963;

C.S.1922, § 7817;

C.S.1929, § 44-404;

R.S.1943, § 44-205;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 46;

Laws 1997, LB 52, § 1.